Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.320

Action by person damaged by malicious mischief to livestock or by owner damaged by theft of livestock—Treble damages, attorney's fees.

Any person whose livestock is damaged as a result of actions described in RCW 16.52.205 or any owner of livestock who suffers damage as a result of a willful, unauthorized act described in RCW 9A.56.080, 9A.56.083, or 16.52.320 may bring an action against the person or persons committing the act in a court of competent jurisdiction for exemplary damages up to three times the actual damages sustained, plus attorney's fees. As used in this section, "livestock" means the animals specified in RCW 9A.56.080 and 16.52.011.

[ 2011 c 67 s 2; 2005 c 419 s 2; 2003 c 53 s 4; 1979 c 145 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 174 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.